Maryland, session 2025, SB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Maryland Horse Industry Board.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0380*

SENATE BILL 380
(c) “Boarding stable” means an establishment that solicits or offers to the public
to stable horses.
(D) “BREEDING STABLE” MEANS AN ESTABLISHMENT IN CONNECTION WITH
WHICH ONE OR MORE HORSES ARE OFFERED FOR SALE TO THE PUBLIC FOR
BREEDING OR AS THE PRODUCT OF BREEDING.
[(d)] (E) “Equine activities” includes teaching equestrian skills, participating in
equestrian competitions, exhibitions or other displays of equestrian skills, and caring for,
breeding, boarding, renting, riding, or training horses.
[(e)] (F) “Horse” includes horses, donkeys, mules, and ponies.
[(f)] (G) “Horse establishment” means an establishment that solicits or offers to
the public any of the following services:
(1) A boarding stable;
(2) A BREEDING STABLE;
[(2)] (3) A lesson or rental stable; or
[(3)] (4) A rescue or sanctuary stable.
[(g)] (H) “Lesson or rental stable” means an establishment in connection with
which one or more horses are offered to the public to be let for hire, to be ridden or driven,
either with or without the furnishing of riding or driving instructions.
[(h)] (I) “Rescue or sanctuary stable” means an establishment that offers to the
public to shelter or keep one or more horses for humane purposes with or without
compensation and with or without tax–exempt status.
[(i)] (J) “Stable” means a place where one or more horses are under the care,
custody, and control of an operator.
2–710.
A person may not engage in the business of operating or maintaining any horse
establishment unless the person has received a license issued by the Board.
2–713.
(a) Each horse establishment licensed under this subtitle shall be inspected as
determined by the Board.

SENATE BILL 380 3
2–714.
(b) Each licensee shall display the license conspicuously on the premises where a
horse establishment is operated by the licensee.
2–715.
The Board may suspend or revoke the license issued to any licensee under this
subtitle, if the licensee:
(1) Fails to provide suitable food, water, and shelter for a horse under the
control of the licensee;
(2) Maintains an unsanitary or unfit horse establishment;
(3) Fails to provide suitable saddles, bridles, harnesses, and other tack or
equipment;
(4) Allows unfit horses to be used for riding or driving purposes;
(5) Refuses to allow a member of the Board to enter and inspect the
licensed premises;
(6) Obstructs any member of the Board in the performance of his duties;
(7) Commits an act of cruelty as defined in § 10–601 of the Criminal Law
Article, or allows the commission of an act of cruelty by any other person with relation to
any horse under the control of the licensee;
(8) Does any other action that, in the opinion of the Board, taking into
consideration the welfare of the horses under the control of the licensee, shows that the
licensee is unfit to operate a horse establishment; or
(9) Fails to comply with the rules and regulations of the Board after
receiving a license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.